Alaska statutes. Title 18. Health, Safety, Housing, Human Rights, and Public Defender.
Article 5. General Provisions.

Sec. 18.80.300.
Definitions.

In this chapter,

“blockbusting” means an unlawful discriminatory practice by a real estate broker, real estate salesperson, or employee or agent of a broker or another individual, corporation, partnership, or organization for the purpose of inducing a real estate transaction from which any such person or its stockholders or members may benefit financially, to represent directly or indirectly that a change has occurred or will or may occur from a composition with respect to race, religion, color, or national origin of the owners or occupants of the block, neighborhood, or area in which the real property is located, and to represent directly or indirectly that this change may or will result in undesirable consequences in the block, neighborhood, or area in which the real property is located, including the lowering of property values, an increase in criminal or antisocial behavior, or decline in the quality of the schools or other facilities;

“commission” means the State Commission for Human Rights;

“complainant” means a person who is aggrieved by a discriminatory practice prohibited by this chapter and who has filed a complaint as provided in AS

18.80.100

;

“employee” means an individual employed by an employer but does not include an individual employed in the domestic service of any person;

“employer” means a person, including the state and a political subdivision of the state, who has one or more employees in the state but does not include a club that is exclusively social, or a fraternal, charitable, educational, or religious association or corporation, if the club, association, or corporation is not organized for private profit;

“employment agency” means a person undertaking to procure employees or opportunities to work;

“executive director” means the executive director of the State Commission for Human Rights;

“financial institution” means a commercial bank, trust company, mutual savings bank, cooperative bank, homestead association, mutual savings and loan association, or an insurance company;

“labor organization” means an organization and an agent of the organization, for the purpose, in whole or in part, of collective bargaining, dealing with employers concerning grievances, terms or conditions of employment, or of other mutual aid or protection of employees;

“major life activities” means functions such as caring for one’s self, performing manual tasks, walking, seeing, hearing, speaking, breathing, learning, and working;

“national origin” includes ancestry;

“pay” means wages; salaries; commissions; amounts an employer contributes to retirement, health, or other fringe benefit plans; and other forms of remuneration paid to an employee for personal services;

“person” means one or more individuals, labor unions, partnerships, associations, corporations, legal representatives, mutual companies, joint-stock companies, trusts, unincorporated organizations, trustees, trustees in bankruptcy, receivers, employees, employers, employment agencies, or labor organizations;

“physical or mental disability” means

a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities;

a history of, or a misclassification as having, a mental or physical impairment that substantially limits one or more major life activities;

having

a physical or mental impairment that does not substantially limit a person’s major life activities but that is treated by the person as constituting such a limitation;

a physical or mental impairment that substantially limits a person’s major life activities only as a result of the attitudes of others toward the impairment; or

none of the impairments defined in this paragraph but being treated by others as having such an impairment; or

a condition that may require the use of a prosthesis, special equipment for mobility, or service animal;

“physical or mental impairment” means

physiological disorder or condition, cosmetic disfigurement, or anatomical loss affecting one or more of the following body systems: neurological, musculoskeletal, special sense organs, respiratory including speech organs, cardiovascular, reproductive, digestive, genito-urinary, hemic and lymphatic, skin, and endocrine;

mental or psychological disorder, including intellectual disability, organic brain syndrome, emotional or mental illness, and specific learning disabilities;

“public accommodation” means a place that caters or offers its services, goods, or facilities to the general public and includes a public inn, restaurant, eating house, hotel, motel, soda fountain, soft drink parlor, tavern, night club, roadhouse, place where food or spiritous or malt liquors are sold for consumption, trailer park, resort, campground, barber shop, beauty parlor, bathroom, resthouse, theater, swimming pool, skating rink, golf course, cafe, ice cream parlor, transportation company, and all other public amusement and business establishments, subject only to the conditions and limitations established by law and applicable alike to all persons;

“real property” means a building or portion of a building, whether constructed or to be constructed, structures, real estate, lands, tenements, leaseholds, interests in real estate cooperatives, condominiums, and hereditaments, corporeal and incorporeal, or any interest therein;

“state” includes the University of Alaska and the judicial, legislative, and executive branches of state government including all departments, agencies, commissions, councils, boards, divisions, and sections.

History.

(§ 6 ch 117 SLA 1965; am §§ 13, 14 ch 104 SLA 1975; am §§ 3, 4 ch 125 SLA 1980; am §§ 15, 16 ch 69 SLA 1987; am § 12 ch 63 SLA 2006; am § 11 ch 42 SLA 2013; am § 10 ch 9 SLA 2014)

Revisor’s notes. —

Reorganized in 1986, 1987, and 2006 to alphabetize the defined terms.